app/utils/MuseScoreWindows/tables/ur-pk-g2.ctb
# 1 Character Signs                                                        ASCII Full          ASCII Contraction    Remarks
midword \x064E 2                                                           1                   1                    Needed for correct back-translation
lowword \x06C1\x0631 236                                                   HR                  8
midendword \x06BE 236                                                      8                   8                    Needed for correct back-translation
endword \x0627\x064B 6                                                     A2                  ,
word \x0627\x06CC\x06A9 1                                                  AIK                 A
word \x0628\x064F\x06C1\x062A 12                                           BUHT                B
word \x0628\x06C1\x062A 12                                                 BHT                 B
begword \x0627\x0633 15                                                    AS                  E
noback begword \x0627\x0650\x0633 15                                       AES                 E
begword \x0627\x0633\x0651 1-6-234                                         AS,                 A,S
word \x067E\x0631 1234                                                     PR                  P
word \x062A\x0648 2345                                                     TW                  T
word \x062A\x06C1\x0627\x0628\x062A 1456                                   THABT               ?
word \x062C\x0648 245                                                      JW                  J
word \x0686\x0627\x06C1\x06CC\x06D2 14                                     CAHI/               C
noback word \x0686\x0627\x06C1\x0626\x06D2 14                              CAH'/               C
noback word \x0686\x0627\x06C1\x064A\x0654\x06D2 14                        CAH'/               C
noback word \x0686\x0627\x06C1\x0650\x0626\x06D2 14                        CAHE'/              C
word \x0634\x0627\x0635\x0644 156                                          :A&L                :
word \x062E\x0627\x0644\x06CC 1346                                         XALI                X
word \x062F\x0648\x0646\x0648\x06BA 145                                    DWNW;               D
word \x0688\x0627\x06A9\x062A\x0631 346                                    +AKTR               +
word \x0630\x0631\x0627 2346                                               !RA                 !
word \x0631\x0627\x0626\x06D2 1235                                         RA'/                R
noback word \x0631\x0627\x064A\x0654\x06D2 1235                            RA'/                R
word \x0631\x0627\x0654\x06D2 1235                                         RA'/                R
word \x06A9\x0648 12456                                                    KW                  ]
word \x0632\x06CC\x0627\x062F\x06C1 1356                                   ZIADH               Z
word \x0632\x0650\x06CC\x0627\x062F\x06C1 1356                             ZEYDH               Z
word \x0633\x06D2 234                                                      S/                  S
word \x0634\x0627\x06CC\x062F 146                                          %AID                %
word \x0635\x0650\x0631\x0641 12346                                        &ERF                &
word \x0636\x0627\x0626\x0639 1246                                         $A'(                $
noback word \x0636\x0627\x064A\x0654\x0639 1246                            $A'(                $
word \x0637\x0631\x062D 23456                                              )R:                 )
word \x063A\x0631\x0636 126                                                <R$                 <
word \x0641\x0627\x0636 124                                                FR$                 F
word \x0642\x0628\x0644 12345                                              QBL                 Q
word \x06A9\x06C1 13                                                       KH                  K
word \x0627\x06AF\x0631 1245                                               AGR                 G
word \x0644\x06CC\x06A9\x0646 123                                          LIKN                L
word \x0645\x06CC\x06BA 134                                                MI;                 M
always \x0645\x064E\x06CC\x06BA\s\x0646\x06D2 134-0-3456                   M1I; N/             M #
word \x0646\x06C1\x06CC\x06BA 1345                                         NHI;                N
word \x0648\x06C1 2456                                                     WH                  W
word \x06C1\x06D2 125                                                      H/                  H
# midendword \x0633\x0627 345                                                SA                  >            Contraction correct but advised to ignore as it is confusing.
prfword \x0646\x06D2 3456                                                  N/                  #
word \x06CC\x06C1 24                                                       IH                  I
word \x06CC\x06C1\x06CC 34                                                 IHI                 /
noback word \x06CC\x0650\x06C1\x06CC 34                                    IEHI                /
midendword \x06D2 34                                                       /                   /             Needed for correct back-translation
always \x06CC\x0627 13456                                                  IA                  Y
always \x0628\x06CC\x0627 12-13456                                         BIA                 BY            to override BI contraction
noback always \x0650\x06CC\x0627\x0646 13456-1345                          EIAN                YN
always \x0646\x0627 26                                                     NA                  5             but not when NA' in which case A' takes precedence
always \x0627\x0646 35                                                     AN                  9
noback always \x0627\x0650\x0646 35                                        AEN                 9
always \x062A\x0627\x0646\x0627 2345-1-26                                  TANA                TA5
always \x0644\x0627 1236                                                   LA                  V             but not when LA' in which case A' takes precedence
always \x0644\x0627\x0653 123-345                                          L>                  L>            because > is sometimes A plus MADDA ABOVE
joinword \x0628\x06D2 36                                                   B/                  -
begword \x0628\x06D2 36                                                    B/                  -

# Alef and Hamza Above combinations
midword \x0627\x0626 4                                                     A'                  @
noback always \x0627\x064A\x0654 4                                         A'                  @
noback always \x0627\x0654 4                                               A'                  @
always \x0644\x0627\x0626 123-4                                            LA'                 L@         to override LA contraction
noback always \x0644\x0627\x064A\x0654 123-4                               LA'                 L@         to override LA contraction
noback always \x0644\x0627\x0654 123-4                                     LA'                 L@         to override LA contraction
always \x0627\x0624 4-2456                                                 AW'                 @W
noback always \x0627\x0648\x0654 4-2456                                    AW'                 @W
always \x0644\x0627\x0624 123-4-2456                                       LAW'                L@W         to override LA contraction
noback always \x0644\x0627\x0648\x0654 123-4-2456                          LAW'                L@W         to override LA contraction
always \x0627\x0624\x064F 4-136-2456                                       AW'U                @UW
noback always \x0627\x0648\x0654\x064F 4-136-2456                          AW'U                @UW
noback always \x0627\x0648\x064F\x0654 4-136-2456                          AWU'                @UW
always \x0644\x0627\x0624\x064F 123-4-136-2456                             LAW'U               L@UW         to override LA contraction
noback always \x0644\x0627\x0648\x0654\x064F 4-136-2456                    LAW'U               L@UW         to override LA contraction
noback always \x0644\x0627\x0648\x064F\x0654 4-136-2456                    LAWU'               L@UW         to override LA contraction
always \x0646\x0627\x0626 1345-4                                           NA'                 N@           to override NA contraction
noback always \x0646\x0627\x064A\x0654 1345-4                              NA'                 N@           to override NA contraction
always \x0646\x0627\x0624 1345-4-2456                                      NAW'                N@W          to override NA contraction
noback always \x0646\x0627\x0648\x0654 1345-4-2456                         NAW'                N@W          to override NA contraction
always \x0646\x0627\x0624\x064F 1345-4-136-2456                            NAW'U               N@UW         to override NA contraction
noback always \x0646\x0627\x0648\x0654\x064F 1345-4-136-2456               NAW'U               N@UW         to override NA contraction

word \x067E\x06BE\x0650\x0631 235                                          P8ER                6
word \x062A\x06A9 1256                                                     TK                  [backslash]
word \x062C\x0628 356                                                      JB                  J
word \x062C\x0628\x06A9\x06C1 245-13                                       JBKH                JK                    Using contraction for JB and KH together
word \x0627\x0648\x0631 136                                                AWR                 U
noback word \x0627\x064E\x0648\x0631 136                                   A1WR                U
lowword \x0628\x06BE\x06CC 23                                              B8I                 2
word \x0679\x0650\x06BE\x06CC\x06A9 135                                    [E8IK               O
word \x0679\x06BE\x06CC\x06A9 135                                          [8IK                O
# word \x0645\x06AF\x0631 2356                                               MGR                 7                     Contraction correct but better to ignore
# endword \x0648\x0646\x06AF 2356                                            WNG                 7                     Contraction correct but better to ignore
word \x062D\x0627\x0635\x0650\x0644 156                                    :A&EL               :

midword \x0020\x0648\x0020 36                                              spaceWspace         -                      join words with hyphen: 'and'

word \x062F\x0650\x0626\x06D2 145-24-34                                    DE'/                DI/
noback word \x062F\x0626\x06D2 145-24-34                                   D'/                 DI/
noback word \x062F\x0626\x0650\x06D2 145-24-34                             D'E/                DI/
word \x062F\x06BE\x0646\x0626\x06D2 145-236-1345-24-34                     D8N'/               D8HI/
word \x06A9\x0650\x0626\x06D2 13-24-34                                     KE'/                KI/

# New Ones
word \x0639\x0631\x0636 12356                                              (R$                  (
